apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="temp/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oris</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ori</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ora</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oribus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ora</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oribus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ora</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oribus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cap/ut__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ut</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itis</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iti</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ut</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ut</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ita</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itum</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itibus</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ita</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itibus</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ita</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itibus</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="re/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bus</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bus</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bus</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ag/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rorum</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ros</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tempus"><i>temp</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caput"><i>cap</i><par n="cap/ut__n"/></e>
    <e lm="res"><i>re</i><par n="re/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ager"><i>ag</i><par n="ag/er__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "caput" ><i>cap</i><par n="cap/ut__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "corpus" ><i>corp</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "crus" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "decus" ><i>dec</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "dedecus" ><i>dedec</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "facinus" ><i>facin</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "foedus" ><i>foed</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "frigus" ><i>frig</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "funus" ><i>fun</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "genus" ><i>gen</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ius" ><i>i</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ius" ><i>i</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "latus" ><i>lat</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "litus" ><i>lit</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "munus" ><i>mun</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "nemus" ><i>nem</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "olus" ><i>ol</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "onus" ><i>on</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "opus" ><i>op</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pectus" ><i>pect</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pignus" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pondus" ><i>pond</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pus" ><i>p</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "rudus" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "rus" ><i>r</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "scelus" ><i>scel</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "sidus" ><i>sid</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "sinciput" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="cap/ut__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "stercus" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "tempus" ><i>temp</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "tempus" ><i>temp</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "tus" ><i>t</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ulcus" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "vellus" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "viscus" ><i>visc</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "vulnus" ><i>vuln</i><par n="temp/us__n"/></e>
